South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H4735.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  (A) There is created the "Truancy Root Cause Intervention Study Committee" to examine the adequacy of current truancy intervention programs and determine what modifications are needed to ensure that such programs meaningfully identify, investigate, and address home-environment-related factors and other underlying circumstances contributing to individual instances of student truancy. (B) The study committee must: (1) review all existing state-mandated and district-level truancy intervention procedures; (2) evaluate the extent to which current interventions assess home environmental factors, including household stability, caregiving responsibilities, health and safety considerations, transportation access, and other relevant conditions, and the degree to which school responses address these factors and attempt to mitigate their impact in an effort to reduce truancy by the individual student; (3) consider best practices from other states and national organizations regarding individualized truancy assessment models; (4) identify gaps in current law or policy related to investigating root causes of truancy; and (5) develop recommendations for statutory, regulatory, or programmatic changes necessary to improve individualized truancy investigations and intervention effectiveness. (C) The study committee must be composed of the following, with vacancies to be filled in the manner of the original appointment: (1) three members of the Senate, appointed by the Chairman of the Senate Education Committee; (2) three members of the House of Representatives, appointed by the Chairman of the House Education and Public Works Committee; (3) the State Superintendent of Education, or his designee; (4) the Director of the Department of Social Services, or his designee; (5) the Director of the Children's Law Center at the University of South Carolina, or his designee; and (6) two members of the general public, appointed by the Governor, who have demonstrated interest and expertise in child welfare issues or education. (D) The Senate Education Committee and the House Education and Public Works Committee shall provide appropriate staffing and administrative support for the study committee. (E) The study committee shall submit a written report, including legislative recommendations, to the General Assembly on or before July 1, 2027, at which time the study committee is dissolved. SECTION 2.  This joint resolution takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----